Washington statutes.
RCW 18.51.200

Preliminary review of complaint—On-site investigation.

Upon receipt of a complaint, the department shall make a preliminary review of the complaint. Unless the department determines that the complaint is willfully intended to harass a licensee or is without any reasonable basis, or unless the department has sufficient information that corrective action has been taken, it shall make an on-site investigation within a reasonable time after the receipt of the complaint or otherwise ensure complaints are responded to. In either event, the complainant shall be promptly informed of the department's proposed course of action. If the complainant requests the opportunity to do so, the complainant or his or her representative, or both, may be allowed to accompany the inspector to the site of the alleged violations during his or her tour of the facility, unless the inspector determines that the privacy of any patient would be violated thereby.

[ 2011 c 336 s 487; 1981 1st ex.s. c 2 s 21; 1975 1st ex.s. c 99 s 5.]

NOTES:

Severability—Effective dates—1981 1st ex.s. c 2: See notes following RCW 18.51.010.